Utah statutes.
32A-12-401.   Advertising prohibited -- Exceptions.
(1) (a)  The advertising of liquor by the department is prohibited, except:
(i)  the department may provide for an appropriate sign in the window or on
the front of a state store or package agency denoting that it is a state
authorized liquor outlet;
(ii)  the department or a package agency may provide printed price lists to
the public;
(iii)  the department may authorize the use of price posting and floor
stacking of liquor within state stores;
(iv)  subject to Subsection (1)(b), the department may provide a listing of
the address and telephone number of a state store in one or more printed or
electronic directories available to the general public; and
(v)  subject to Subsection (1)(b), a package agency may provide a listing of
its address and telephone number in one or more printed or electronic
directories available to the general public.
(b)  Any listing under Subsection (1)(a)(iv) or (v) in the business or yellow
pages of a telephone directory may not be displayed in an advertisement or
other promotional format.
(2) (a)  The department may not advertise alcoholic beverages on billboards.
(b)  A package agency may not advertise alcoholic beverages on billboards
except to the extent allowed by the commission by rule.
(3) (a)  The department may not display liquor or price lists in windows or
showcases visible to passersby.
(b)  A package agency may not display liquor or price lists in windows or
showcases visible to passersby except to the extent allowed by the commission
by rule.
(4)  Except to the extent prohibited by this title, the advertising of
alcoholic beverages is allowed under guidelines established by the commission
by rule.
(5)  The advertising or use of any means or media to offer alcoholic beverages
to the general public without charge is prohibited.
